Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 9.15, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 9.15 Expedited filing service ââ surcharge. 1. Upon the request of the filer of a document, the secretary shall provide an expedited filing service. As part of the service, the secretary shall file a document submitted by a filer on an expedited basis. 2. The secretary shall implement, assess, and collect a surcharge for providing the expedited filing service based on the period of service as follows: a. For a one-hour service, the surcharge shall be two hundred dollars. b. For a same-day service, the surcharge shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars. c. For a two-day service, the surcharge shall be fifty dollars. b. d. For a five-day service, the surcharge shall be fifteen dollars. 3. The surcharge shall be added to the amount of the fee implemented, assessed, and collected for the actual filing of the document. Senate File 629, p. 2 4. At the time of the expedited filing, the secretary shall provide written confirmation of the filing. 4. 5. Any moneys collected by the secretary under this section shall be deposited in the business administration fund created in section 9.13 . ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 629, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor